Washington statutes.
RCW 33.04.025

Rules.

The director shall adopt uniform rules in accordance with the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, to govern examinations and reports of associations and the form in which they shall report their assets, liabilities, and reserves, charge off bad debts and otherwise keep their records and accounts, and otherwise to govern the administration of this title. The director shall mail a copy of the rules to each savings and loan association at its principal place of business. The person doing the mailing shall make and file his or her affidavit thereof in the office of the director.

[ 1994 c 92 s 417; 1982 c 3 s 5; 1973 c 130 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.